Massachusetts, session 194th, S1114.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 172 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the last paragraph the following
paragraph:-
(p) The commissioner of probation shall add information in the commissioner’s database
upon said information’s receipt as to the date of a person’s release from a house of corrections,
prison or jail to implement automated and expedited record sealing, and the department of
criminal justice information services shall include the date of a person’s release from a house of
corrections, prison, or jail for any offense as part of criminal offender record information if the
date is known to the department.
of 6

SECTION 2. Section 18 ¾ of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amending by inserting after the last paragraph the following paragraph:-
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the secretary
shall forthwith establish and implement procedures for the department of correction, any house
of corrections and any jail to report on the seventh day of each month to the commissioner of
probation the names, personal identifying information, and the actual dates that any person was
released from the house of corrections, jail or the department of correction during the prior
month and also shall provide such information as to other dates of past release for other
individuals as requested or needed by the commissioner of probation to implement automated
and expedited sealing of records, and the inclusion of the dates a person was released from
custody or incarceration on criminal offender and juvenile court activity record information
reports.
SECTION 3. Section 100A of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following three
paragraphs:-
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person shall not be required to file a petition
or other form of a request in order to seal any record of criminal court appearances and
dispositions related to a criminal offense in the commonwealth under this section after an
applicable waiting period, except as specified within this section. The commissioner of probation
shall establish and implement an automated process for sealing of such records. The
commissioner shall seal all such records within 30 days of the time that the records became
eligible for sealing under this section; provided, however, that sealing of any conviction for a sex
of 6

offense, as defined in section 178C of chapter 6, shall require that a person with such records file
a request for sealing of such convictions with the commissioner on a form provided by the
commissioner. In the event that records of any offense required to be sealed under this section
without a request are not sealed due to an error or omission or lack of availability of a court
record based on the age of said record, a person with such records shall not be precluded from
seeking relief, and the commissioner of probation shall seal such records forthwith upon receipt
of any request to seal said record from the person or the person’s legal representative.
The commissioner of probation shall provide all defendants at the time of a conviction or
other disposition of their offense or offenses with a notice that the offense or offenses may be
sealed in the future without the necessity of filing a petition to seal the records, a brief summary
of the sealing law, and a list of resources related to sealing of records. The clerk’s office of any
division of the trial court, the commissioner of probation, and any other criminal justice agency,
upon request of a person whose records are sealed, or the person’s legal representative, shall
provide access to the sealed records to the person or the person’s legal representative without
said person, or legal representative obtaining a court order or having to unseal the records.
The commissioner of probation shall seal records of any record of criminal court
appearances and dispositions related to a criminal offense or offenses in the commonwealth on
file with the commissioner provided that: (1) the person's court appearance and court disposition,
including any period of incarceration or custody for any misdemeanor record to be sealed
occurred not less than 3 years prior to the sealing; (2) the person's court appearance and court
disposition, including any period of incarceration or custody for any felony record to be sealed
occurred not less than 7 years prior to the sealing; and (3) the person has not been found guilty of
any criminal offense in the commonwealth in the case of a misdemeanor, 3 years prior to the
of 6

sealing, and in the case of a felony, 7 years prior to the sealing. This section shall apply to court
appearances and dispositions of all offenses, with the exception of convictions for violations of
sections 121 to 129, inclusive, sections 131A to 131D, inclusive, and section 131F of chapter
140, and convictions for violations of chapter 268 and chapter 268A, which are all excluded
from sealing, except for convictions for resisting arrest. A person with a possession of marijuana
offense that was later decriminalized, is not precluded from seeking earlier and immediate
sealing of the records, if the person files a request for such sealing on a form that shall be
provided by the commissioner.
SECTION 4. Section 100A of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “files”, in line 60, the following words: within 30 days of notification of
such record sealing.
SECTION 5. Section 100B of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the first paragraph, and inserting in place thereof the following two
paragraphs: -
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person charged as a delinquent or youthful
offender shall not be required to file a petition or other form of request in order to seal any record
of criminal court appearances and dispositions related to a juvenile court offense. The
commissioner of probation shall establish and implement an automated process for sealing of
such records. The commissioner shall seal said records in the commonwealth on file with the
commissioner within 30 days after any records become eligible for sealing after the applicable 3-
year waiting period. The records shall become eligible for sealing when: (1) any court
appearance or disposition including court supervision, probation, commitment or parole for the
of 6

records to be sealed, terminated not less than 3 years earlier; and (2) said person has not been
adjudicated delinquent or as a youthful offender, found guilty of any criminal offense in the trial
court of the commonwealth, or been committed as a juvenile or imprisoned within the
commonwealth in the preceding 3 years. In the event that records of any offense required to be
sealed under this section without a petition are not sealed due to an error or omission or lack of
availability of a court record based on the age of said record, a person with such an offense shall
not be precluded from seeking relief, and the commissioner of probation shall seal such records
forthwith upon receipt of a request to seal said records from the person or the person’s legal
representative.
The commissioner of probation shall provide all individuals at the time of an adjudication
or other final disposition of their offense or offenses with a notice that the offenses may be
sealed in the future without the necessity of filing a petition to seal the records, a brief summary
of the sealing law, and a list of resources related to sealing of records. The clerk’s office of any
division of the trial court, the commissioner of probation, or any other criminal justice agency,
upon request of a person whose offense or offenses are sealed, or the person’s legal
representative, shall provide access to the sealed records to the person or the person’s legal
representative without said person, attorney or legal representative obtaining a court order or
having to unseal the record.
SECTION 6. Section 100B of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “files”, in line 28, the following words:- within 30 days of notification of
such record sealing.
of 6

SECTION 7. Said section 100B of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 21, 37, 38 and 40, the word “delinquency” each time it appears
100 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- juvenile court
101 SECTION 8. Said section 100B of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further
102 amended by striking out in the fourth paragraph the words “a delinquent” and inserting in place
103 thereof the following words:- by the juvenile court
104 SECTION 9. Section 100Q of chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
105 striking out the words “or section 100B” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- ,
106 section 100B or section 100C.
107 SECTION 10. This act shall take effect 18 months following its passage. The
108 commissioner of probation shall commence the process of sealing records through the automated
109 record sealing process on or before the effective date of this act.
110 SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any general law or special law to the contrary, as soon as
111 practicable, and not later than 3 months after the effective date of this act, the commissioner of
112 probation shall seal any other records in its computerized database of: (i) all past criminal court
113 appearances and dispositions in the commonwealth on file with the commissioner that are
114 eligible for sealing under section 100A of chapter 276; and (ii) all past juvenile court offenses in
115 the commonwealth on file with the commissioner that are eligible for sealing under section 100B
116 of chapter 276. In the event that records of any offense that is eligible for sealing are not sealed,
117 a person with such records shall not be precluded from seeking other relief, and the
118 commissioner of probation shall seal such records forthwith upon receipt of any request to seal
119 said records from the person or the person’s legal representative.
of 6